apertium-cy-en/apertium-cy-en.cy.dix.xml
    <pardef n="achub__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wn</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impv"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wch</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impv"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ent</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impv"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wn</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ech</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ent</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ais</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aist</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>odd</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asom</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asoch</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asant</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wyd</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aswn</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asit</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asai</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asem</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asech</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asent</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asid</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="plu"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>af</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wn</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wch</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ant</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wyf</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sjnc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ych</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sjnc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sjnc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sjnc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>och</l>
          
            
            
            
            
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="sjnc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ont</l>
          
            
            
            
            

    <e lm="addef"><i>addef</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="adethol"><i>adethol</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="adrodd"><i>adrodd</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ailadrodd"><i>ailadrodd</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ailddarllen"><i>ailddarllen</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ailddewis"><i>ailddewis</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ailedrych"><i>ailedrych</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ailosod"><i>ailosod</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ailymosod"><i>ailymosod</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="amgyffred"><i>amgyffred</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="arbed"><i>arbed</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="arllwys"><i>arllwys</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="brigladd"><par n="initial-b"/><i>rigladd</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="camarfer"><par n="initial-c"/><i>amarfer</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="canlyn"><par n="initial-c"/><i>anlyn</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="chwarae"><par n="initial-c"/><i>hwarae</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ciprys"><par n="initial-c"/><i>iprys</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="crybwyll"><par n="initial-c"/><i>rybwyll</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cydadrodd"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ydadrodd</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cydganlyn"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ydganlyn</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cydraddol"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ydraddol</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cyfarth"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yfarth</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cyfogi"><par n="initial-c"/><i>yfog</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cysodi"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ysod</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dadwrdd"><par n="initial-d"/><i>adwrdd</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="darnladd"><par n="initial-d"/><i>arnladd</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="datod"><par n="initial-d"/><i>atod</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="deor"><par n="initial-d"/><i>eor</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="didol"><par n="initial-d"/><i>idol</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="difodi"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ifod</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="diolch"><par n="initial-d"/><i>iolch</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="diwraidd"><par n="initial-d"/><i>iwraidd</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dynwared"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ynwared</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="edfryd"><i>edfryd</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="eistedd"><i>eistedd</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gafael"><par n="initial-g"/><i>afael</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gosod"><par n="initial-g"/><i>osod</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gwahardd"><par n="initial-g"/><i>wahardd</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gwrthod"><par n="initial-g"/><i>wrthod</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hedfan"><i>hedfan</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="isosod"><i>isosod</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="llongyfarch"><par n="initial-ll"/><i>ongyfarch</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="meithrin"><par n="initial-m"/><i>eithrin</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mwmian"><par n="initial-m"/><i>wmian</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rhagod"><par n="initial-rh"/><i>agod</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="simsan"><i>simsan</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tincial"><par n="initial-t"/><i>incial</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="trydar"><par n="initial-t"/><i>rydar</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ymadrodd"><i>ymadrodd</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ymarfer"><i>ymarfer</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ymddatod"><i>ymddatod</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ymddiried"><i>ymddiried</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ymlid"><i>ymlid</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ymosod"><i>ymosod</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="yngan"><i>yngan</i><par n="achub__vblex"/></e>
